North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 12K. Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee.

§ 120-70.100.
Creation and membership of Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee.

The Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee is established. The Committee consists of 16 members as follows:

Eight members of the Senate appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Eight members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, at least three of whom are members of the minority party.

Members of the Committee shall serve a term of two years beginning on January 15 of each odd-numbered year. Members may complete a term of service on the Committee even if they do not seek reelection or are not reelected to the General Assembly, but resignation or removal from service in the General Assembly constitutes resignation or removal from service on the Committee. A member continues to serve until the member’s successor is appointed. A vacancy shall be filled within 30 days by the officer who made the original appointment.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(a); 2011-291, s. 1.3(b); 2012-187, s. 1.

§ 120-70.101.
Purpose and powers of Committee.

The Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee has the following powers and duties:

To review rules to which the Rules Review Commission has objected to determine if statutory changes are needed to enable the agency to fulfill the intent of the General Assembly.

To receive reports prepared by the Rules Review Commission containing the text and a summary of each rule approved by the Commission.

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-125, s. 1, effective October 1, 2009.

(3a)

To review the activities of State occupational licensing boards to determine if the boards are operating in accordance with statutory requirements and if the boards are still necessary to achieve the purposes for which they were created. This review shall not include decisions concerning board personnel matters or determinations on individual licensing applications or individual disciplinary actions.

To review State regulatory programs to determine if the programs overlap, have conflicting goals, or could be simplified and still achieve the purpose of the regulation.

To review existing rules to determine if the rules are necessary or if the rules can be streamlined.

To review the rule-making process to determine if the procedures for adopting rules give the public adequate notice of and information about proposed rules.

To review any other concerns about administrative law to determine if statutory changes are needed.

To report to the General Assembly from time to time concerning the Committee’s activities and any recommendations for statutory changes.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 7.10(h); 2009-125, s. 1; 2011-291, s. 1.3(b); 2012-187, s. 1.

§ 120-70.102.
Organization of Committee.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each designate a cochair of the Joint Legislative Administrative Procedure Oversight Committee. The Committee shall meet at least once a quarter and may meet at other times upon the joint call of the cochairs.

A quorum of the Committee is nine members. No action may be taken except by a majority vote at a meeting at which a quorum is present. While in the discharge of its official duties, the Committee has the powers of a joint committee under

G.S. 120-19

and

G.S. 120-19

.1 through

G.S. 120-19.4

.

Members of the Committee receive subsistence and travel expenses as provided in

G.S. 120-3.1

. The Committee may contract for consultants or hire employees in accordance with

G.S. 120-32.02

. The Committee may meet in the Legislative Building or the Legislative Office Building upon the approval of the Legislative Services Commission. The Legislative Services Commission, through the Legislative Services Officer, shall assign professional staff to assist the Committee in its work. Upon the direction of the Legislative Services Commission, the Supervisors of Clerks of the Senate and of the House of Representatives shall assign clerical staff to the Committee. The expenses for clerical employees shall be paid by the Committee.

History.

1995, c. 507, s. 27.8(a); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 8(l); 2011-291, s. 1.3(b); 2012-187, s. 1.

§ 120-70.103.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-125, s. 5, effective October 1, 2009.

§ 120-70.104.

Reserved for future codification purposes.